Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3660.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299C.80, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) As used in this section, the following terms have the meanings provided. new text begin (b) "Federal agent" means a federal agent employed directly by the United States Department of Homeland Security or employed by United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, United States Customs and Border Protection, or United States Citizenship and Immigration Services. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end "Law enforcement agency" has the meaning given in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (f). deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end "Officer-involved death" means the death of another that results from anew text begin federal agent or anew text end peace officer's use of force while the new text begin agent or new text end officer is on duty or off duty but performing activities that are within the scope of the new text begin agent or new text end officer's law enforcement duties. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end "Peace officer" has the meaning given in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c). deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end "Superintendent" means the superintendent of the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end "Unit" means the independent Use of Force Investigations Unit. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299C.80, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Additional duty. (a) The unit shall investigate all criminal sexual conduct cases: (1) involving peace officersnew text begin or federal agentsnew text end , including criminal sexual conduct cases involving chief law enforcement officers; and (2) where a member of the Minnesota National Guard is the victim, the accused is a member of the Minnesota National Guard, and the incident occurred in Minnesota. (b) The unit shall assist the agency investigating an alleged sexual assault of a member of the Minnesota National Guard by another member of the Minnesota National Guard that occurred in a jurisdiction outside of the state, if the investigating agency requests assistance from the unit. (c) The unit may also investigate conflict of interest cases involving peace officers.